New York, session 2025-2026, S8506.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 392-a of the vehicle and traffic law is REPEALED 2 and a new section 392-a is added to read as follows: 3 § 392-a. Fraudulent motor vehicle documents and plates. 1. A person 4 who knowingly sells, offers to sell, buys, or offers to buy a false, 5 fraudulent, or stolen license, identification card, certificate of 6 registration, or number plate shall be guilty of: 7 (a) First Offense: A Class E felony, punishable by up to one year of 8 imprisonment and a fine of no less than five hundred dollars; and 9 (b) Second Offense Within Ten Years: A Class D felony, punishable by 10 one to three years of imprisonment, a fine of no less than one thousand 11 dollars, and a suspension of the offender's driver's license for a peri- 12 od of no less than one year. 13 2. Any person whose driver's license or registration is suspended or 14 revoked and who knowingly uses, displays, or permits the use of a false, 15 fraudulent, or stolen number plate shall be guilty of a Class D felony, 16 punishable by: 17 (a) One to three years of imprisonment; 18 (b) A fine of no less than one thousand five hundred dollars; and 19 (c) An automatic extension of the suspension period for an additional 20 two to four years. 21 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 402 of the vehicle and traffic law is 22 amended by adding a new paragraph (c) to read as follows: 23 (c) A second conviction for violating paragraph (ii), (ii-a), or (iii) 24 of paragraph (b) of this subdivision, committed within ten years of a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13731-01-5 S. 8506 2 1 first conviction, shall be punishable by a fine of not less than five 2 hundred dollars and by the suspension of the offender's driver's license 3 for a period of six months. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 5 have become a law.